inc/flattened/excel2fst/VTI.lexc
LEXICON VTI_oo_o_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0PlO:oosiinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO:oosiinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0PlO:oosiininaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO:oosiininaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0PlO:oosiinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO:oosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0PlO:oosiinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO:oosiinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:oosiini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:oosiinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:oosiini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:oosiinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0PlO:oosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO:oosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:oosiinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:oosiinaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:oosiinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:oosiinininaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:oosiinininaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO:oosiininaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:oosiinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:oosiinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO:oosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0PlO:oonaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO:oonaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO:ooninaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0PlO:oonaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO:oonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0PlO:oonaawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO:oonaawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:ooni # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:oonini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:ooni # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:oonini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0PlO:oonan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:oonaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:oonaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:oonaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:ooninaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:ooninaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO:ooninaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:oonaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:oonaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO:oonaaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_oo_gi_WB
0:%>%> VTI_oo_gi_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_oo_gi_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0PlO:oosiinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO:oosiinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0PlO:oosiinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO:oosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0PlO:oosiiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0SgO:oosiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0PlO:oosiinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO:oosiinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0PlO:oosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO:oosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0PlO:oosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0SgO:oosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:oosiinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:oosiinaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO:oosiinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:oosiinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:oosiinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO:oosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:oosiiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:oosiiminaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0SgO:oosiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0PlO:oonaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO:oonaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0PlO:oonaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO:oonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0PlO:oominaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0SgO:oominaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0PlO:oonaawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO:oonaawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0PlO:oonan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0PlO:oomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0SgO:oomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:oonaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:oonaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO:oonaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:oonaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:oonaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO:oonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:oominaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:oominaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0SgO:oominaaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_oo_ni_WB
0:%>%> VTI_oo_ni_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_oo_ni_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0PlO:oosiinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO:oosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0PlO:oosiiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0SgO:oosiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0PlO:oosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO:oosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0PlO:oosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0SgO:oosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:oosiinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:oosiinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO:oosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:oosiiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:oosiiminaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0SgO:oosiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0PlO:oonaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO:oonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0PlO:oominaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0SgO:oominaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0PlO:oonan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0PlO:oomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0SgO:oomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:oonaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:oonaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO:oonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:oominaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:oominaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0SgO:oominaaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_oo_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VTI_oo_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_oo_NONE_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiigwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiinigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oogwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:oonigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oogoban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                                !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VTI, Stem Type = oon   !!
!!                                                !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_oon_Subclass
+VTI:0 VTI_oon_Flags ;

LEXICON VTI_oon_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTI_oon_NONE_WB ;

LEXICON VTI_oon_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VTI_oon_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_oon_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiinigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwaangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwaambaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwegibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwegobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwambanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwaagobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiinigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwaangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwiingibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiiwiingen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiwaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiwan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosigwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosinig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiwaang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiwang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosing # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiwaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiwegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiwegoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiwamban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosigwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosinigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiwaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosiwangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:oosingiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowaanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:oonigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oogwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowaangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowaambaanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowegibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowegobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowambanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowaagobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:oonigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowaangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowiingibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowiingen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyeg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowaad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:oonid # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:ood # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyaang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:oong # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyegiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyegoban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyamban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oowaapan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:oonipan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:oopan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:ooyangiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:oongiban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                               !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VTI, Stem Type = in   !!
!!                                               !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_in_Subclass
+VTI:0 VTI_in_Flags ;

LEXICON VTI_in_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTI_in_NONE_WB ;

LEXICON VTI_in_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VTI_in_NONE_Endings ;
